src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON mones_kvant
+Sg+Nom:es K ;
+Sg+Par:etta K ;
+Sg+Par:esta K ;
+Sg+Gen:enen K ;
+Sg+Gen:esen K ;
+Sg+Ill:entheen   K ;
+Sg+Ill:esheen   K ;
+Sg+Ess:entenna    K ;
+Sg+Ess:esenna    K ;
+Sg+Tra:eneksi   K ;
+Sg+Tra:eseksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:enessa   K ;
+Sg+Ine:esessa   K ;
+Sg+Ela:enesta   K ;
+Sg+Ela:esesta   K ;
+Sg+All:enelle   K ;
+Sg+All:eselle   K ;
+Sg+Ade:enella    K ;
+Sg+Ade:esella    K ;
+Sg+Abl:enelta   K ;
+Sg+Abl:eselta   K ;
+Pl+Nom:enet K ;
+Pl+Nom:eset K ;
+Pl+Par:enssii K ;
+Pl+Par:enssiita K ;
+Pl+Gen:enssiitten K ;
+Pl+Ill:enshiin   K ;
+Pl+Ess:ensinna    K ;
+Pl+Tra:ensiksi   K ;
+Pl+Ine:ensissa   K ;
+Pl+Ela:ensista   K ;
+Pl+All:ensille   K ;
+Pl+Ade:ensilla    K ;
+Pl+Abl:ensilta   K ;

!LEXICON monen_kvant
!+Sg+Nom:es K ;
!+Sg+Par:etta K ;
!+Sg+Gen:enen K ;
!+Sg+Ill:entheen   K ;
!+Sg+Ess:entenna    K ;
!+Sg+Tra:eneksi   K ;
!+Sg+Ine:enessa   K ;
!+Sg+Ela:enesta   K ;
!+Sg+All:enelle   K ;
!+Sg+Ade:enella    K ;
!+Sg+Abl:enelta   K ;
!+Pl+Nom:enet K ;
!+Pl+Par:enssii K ;
!+Pl+Par:enssiita K ;
!+Pl+Gen:enssiitten K ;
!+Pl+Ill:enshiin   K ;
!+Pl+Ess:ensinna    K ;
!+Pl+Tra:ensiksi   K ;
!+Pl+Ine:ensissa   K ;
!+Pl+Ela:ensista   K ;
!+Pl+All:ensille   K ;
!+Pl+Ade:ensilla    K ;
!+Pl+Abl:ensilta   K ;



LEXICON kielto
+Gen:nenkhään K ;
+Ill:nheenkhään K ;
+Par:thään K ;
+Ess:nenäkhään    K ;
+Tra:neksikhään   K ;
+Ine:nessäkhään   K ;
+Ela:nestäkhään   K ;
+All:nelekhään   K ;
+All:lheen   K ;
+Ade:keläkhään    K ;
+Ade:thään    K ;
+Abl:neltäkhään   K ;
+Abl:lthään   K ;


LEXICON mi_kielto
+Nom: K ;
+Gen:nkhään K ;
+Ill:hinkhään K ;
+Par:thään K ;
+Par+Err/Orth:tään K ; !Suomalainen 
+Ess:nhään    K ;
+Tra:ksikhään   K ;
+Ine:shään   K ;
+Ela:sthään   K ;
+All:llekhään   K ; !m. kelheen, lisätty ed. leksikoon
+Ade:lhään    K ; !m. kelhään
+Abl:lthään   K ; !m. kelthään


LEXICON yht_kielto
+Nom:   K  ;
+Ill:heenkään   K ;
+Par:äkhään   K ;


LEXICON kump_kielto
+Ill:haankaan   K ;


LEXICON sgus_kvant
+Nom:see       K ;
+Nom:ea       K ;
+Nom:ia       K ;
+Gen:heen    K ;
+Gen:ean    K ;
+Gen:ian    K ;
+Ill:heesseen  K ;
+Ill:ehaan  K ;
+Ill:ihaan  K ;
+Par:heeta   K ;
+Par:eaa   K ;
+Par:iaa   K ;
+Ess:heena    K ;
+Ess:eanna    K ;
+Ess:ianna    K ;
+Tra:heeksi   K ;
+Tra:eaksi   K ;
+Tra:iaksi   K ;
+Ine:heessa   K ;
+Ine:eassa   K ;
+Ine:iassa   K ;
+Ela:heesta   K ;
+Ela:easta   K ;
+Ela:iasta   K ;
+All:heele    K ;
+All:ealle    K ;
+All:ialle    K ;
+Ade:heela    K ;
+Ade:ealla    K ;
+Ade:ialla    K ;
+Abl:heelta   K ;
+Abl:ealta   K ;
+Abl:ialta   K ;


LEXICON plushe_kvant
+Nom:eet       K ;
+Gen:itten    K ;
+Ill:issiin  K ;
+Par:ita   K ;
+Ess:ina    K ;
+Tra:iksi   K ;
+Ine:issa   K ;
+Ela:ista   K ;
+All:ile    K ;
+Ade:ila    K ;
+Abl:ilta   K ;


LEXICON plus_kvant
+Nom:eat    K ;
+Nom:iat    K ;


LEXICON paljo_kvant
+Sg+Nom:o K ;
+Sg+Par:oo K ;
+Sg+Gen:on K ;
+Sg+Ill:hoon   K ;
+Sg+Ess:ona    K ;
+Sg+Tra:oksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:ossa   K ;
+Sg+Ela:osta   K ;
+Sg+All:ole   K ;
+Sg+Ade:ola    K ;
+Sg+Abl:olta   K ;
+Pl+Nom:ot K ;
+Pl+Par:oi K ;
+Pl+Gen:oin K ;
+Pl+Ill:hoon   K ;
+Pl+Ess:oina    K ;
+Pl+Tra:oiksi   K ;
+Pl+Ine:oissa   K ;
+Pl+Ela:oista   K ;
+Pl+All:oile   K ;
+Pl+Ade:oila    K ;
+Pl+Abl:oilta   K ;

LEXICON vähä_kvant
+Sg+Nom:ä K ;
+Sg+Par:hää K ;
+Sg+Gen:än K ;
+Sg+Ill:hään   K ;
+Sg+Ess:änä    K ;
+Sg+Tra:äksi   K ;
+Sg+Ine:ässä   K ;
+Sg+Ela:ästä   K ;
+Sg+All:äle   K ;
+Sg+Ade:älä    K ;
+Sg+Abl:ältä   K ;
+Pl+Nom:ät K ;
+Pl+Par:hii K ;
+Pl+Gen:hiin K ;
+Pl+Ill:hiin   K ;
+Pl+Ess:inä    K ;
+Pl+Tra:iksi   K ;
+Pl+Ine:issä   K ;
+Pl+Ela:istä   K ;
+Pl+All:ile   K ;
+Pl+Ade:ilä    K ;
+Pl+Abl:iltä   K ;


LEXICON plmon_kvant
+All:ile    K ;



LEXICON doublecasepronouns

< j o m p:0 i:0 k:0 u:0 m:0 p:0 i:0 "+Pron":0 "+Indef":0 "+Sg":0> sgcases ;


LEXICON  sgcases
< "@U.pron.nom@" 0:p 0:i > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.gen@" 0:m 0:a 0:n > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ill@" 0:p 0:h 0:a 0:a 0:n > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.par@" 0:p 0:p 0:a 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.par2@" 0:p 0:a 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ess@" 0:p 0:a 0:n 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.tra@" 0:m 0:a 0:k 0:s 0:i > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ine@" 0:m 0:a 0:s 0:a 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ela@" 0:m 0:a 0:s 0:t 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.all@" 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:e > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.ade@" 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:a > Continuing ;
< "@U.pron.abl@" 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:t 0:a > Continuing ;


LEXICON Continuing
:kum  Endsgcases;

LEXICON  Endsgcases

< "@U.pron.nom@" "+Nom":0 0:p 0:i > K ;
< "@U.pron.gen@" "+Gen":0 0:m 0:a 0:n > K ;
< "@U.pron.ill@" "+Ill":0 0:p 0:h 0:a 0:a 0:n > K ;
< "@U.pron.par@" "+Par":0 0:p 0:p 0:a 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.par2@" "+Par":0 0:p 0:a 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.ess@" "+Ess":0 0:p 0:a 0:n 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.tra@" "+Tra":0 0:m 0:a 0:k 0:s 0:i > K ;
< "@U.pron.ine@" "+Ine":0 0:m 0:a 0:s 0:s 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.ela@" "+Ela":0 0:m 0:a 0:s 0:t 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.all@" "+All":0 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:e > K ;
< "@U.pron.ade@" "+Ade":0 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.abl@" "+Abl":0 0:m 0:a 0:l 0:t 0:a > K ;


LEXICON doublecasepronounspl

< j o m m:0 a:0 t:0 k:0 u:0 m:0 m:0 a:0 t:0 "+Pron":0 "+Indef":0 "+Pl":0 > plcases ;

!kohta,
!jommat+Pron+Indef+Pl:jom                pljom_indef ;
!kummat+Pron+Indef+Pl:kum                plkum_indef ;


LEXICON  plcases
< "@U.pron.nom@" 0:m 0:a 0:t >              Continues ;
< "@U.pron.gen@" 0:m 0:p 0:i 0:i 0:n >      Continues ;
< "@U.pron.gen2@" 0:m 0:i 0:t 0:t 0:e 0:n > Continues ;
< "@U.pron.ill@" 0:p 0:h 0:i 0:i 0:n >      Continues ;
< "@U.pron.par@" 0:p 0:p 0:i 0:i >          Continues ;
< "@U.pron.par2@" 0:p 0:i 0:i >             Continues ;
< "@U.pron.ess@" 0:p 0:i 0:n 0:a >          Continues ;
< "@U.pron.tra@" 0:m 0:i 0:k 0:s 0:i >      Continues ;
< "@U.pron.ine@" 0:m 0:i 0:s 0:a 0:a >      Continues ;
< "@U.pron.ela@" 0:m 0:i 0:s 0:t 0:a >      Continues ;
< "@U.pron.all@" 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:e >          Continues ;
< "@U.pron.ade@" 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:a >          Continues ;
< "@U.pron.abl@" 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:t 0:a >      Continues ;


LEXICON Continues
:kum  Endplcases;

LEXICON  Endplcases

< "@U.pron.nom@" "+Nom":0 0:m 0:a 0:t > K ;
< "@U.pron.gen@" "+Gen":0 0:p 0:p 0:i 0:i 0:n > K ;
< "@U.pron.gen@" "+Gen":0 0:m 0:i 0:t 0:t 0:e 0:n > K ;
< "@U.pron.ill@" "+Ill":0 0:p 0:h 0:i 0:i 0:n > K ;
< "@U.pron.par@" "+Par":0 0:p 0:p 0:i 0:i > K ;
< "@U.pron.par2@" "+Par":0 0:p 0:i 0:i > K ;
< "@U.pron.ess@" "+Ess":0 0:p 0:i 0:n 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.tra@" "+Tra":0 0:m 0:i 0:k 0:s 0:i > K ;
< "@U.pron.ine@" "+Ine":0 0:m 0:i 0:s 0:s 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.ela@" "+Ela":0 0:m 0:i 0:s 0:t 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.all@" "+All":0 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:e > K ;
< "@U.pron.ade@" "+Ade":0 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:a > K ;
< "@U.pron.abl@" "+Abl":0 0:m 0:i 0:l 0:t 0:a > K ;
