src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun
mones+Pron+Qu:mon                      mones_kvant ;
kukhaan+Pron+Qu:ke              kielto  ;
mikhään+Pron+Qu:mi              mi_kielto  ;
yksikhään+Pron+Qu:yht           yht_kielto ;
kumpikhaan+Pron+Qu:kump         kump_kielto;
ussee+Pron+Qu+Sg:us                   sgus_kvant ;
ussee+Pron+Qu+Pl:ushe                 plushe_kvant ;
ussee+Pron+Qu+Pl:us                   plus_kvant ;
paljo+Pron+Qu:palj                    paljo_kvant ;
vähä+Pron+Qu:väh                      vähä_kvant ;
monta+Pron+Qu:mon                     plmon_kvant ;
